rdevoc.twol
Alphabet

A B C Ç D E F G Ğ H I İ J K L M N O Ö P R S Ş T U Ü V Y Z Q Ə X
a b c ç d e f g ğ h ı i j k l m n o ö p r s ş t u ü v y z q ə x
%<VERB%>:0
%{A%}
%{I%}
%{Q%}
%{K%}
%{N%}
%{C%}
%{SPC%}
%{D%}
%{DASH%}
%{synIn%}
%{synIv%}
%-
;

Sets

Vow = A E I İ O Ö U Ü Ə
		a e ı i o ö u ü ə ;

Rules


"ChangeQ"
q:%{Q%} <=> _ \[%<VERB%>: ];

"ChangeK"
k:%{K%} <=> _ \[%<VERB%>: ];
